Missouri, session 2026, HB2255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 490.065, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 490.065, to read as follows:
490.065. 1. In actions brought under chapter 451, 452, 453, 454, or 455 or in actions
adjudicated in juvenile courts under chapter 211 or in family courts under chapter 487, or in
all proceedings before the probate division of the circuit court, or in all actions or proceedings
in which there is no right to a jury trial:
(1) If scientific, technical or other specialized knowledge will assist the trier of fact to
understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue, a witness qualified as an expert by
knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education may testify thereto in the form of an
opinion or otherwise;
(2) Testimony by such an expert witness in the form of an opinion or inference
otherwise admissible is not objectionable because it embraces an ultimate issue to be decided
by the trier of fact;
(3) The facts or data in a particular case upon which an expert bases an opinion or
inference may be those perceived by or made known to him at or before the hearing and must
be of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the field in forming opinions or inferences
upon the subject and must be otherwise reasonably reliable;
(4) If a reasonable foundation is laid, an expert may testify in terms of opinion or
inference and give the reasons therefor without the use of hypothetical questions, unless the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2255 2
court believes the use of a hypothetical question will make the expert's opinion more
understandable or of greater assistance to the jury due to the particular facts of the case.
2. In all actions except those to which subsection 1 of this section applies:
(1) A witness who is qualified as an expert by knowledge, skill, experience, training,
or education may testify in the form of an opinion or otherwise if the proponent
demonstrates to the court that it is more likely than not that:
(a) The expert's scientific, technical, or other specialized knowledge will help the trier
of fact to understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue;
(b) The testimony is based on sufficient facts or data;
(c) The testimony is the product of reliable principles and methods; and
(d) The [expert has reliably applied] expert's opinion reflects a reliable application
of the principles and methods to the facts of the case;
(2) An expert may base an opinion on facts or data in the case that the expert has been
made aware of or personally observed. If experts in the particular field would reasonably rely
on those kinds of facts or data in forming an opinion on the subject, they need not be
admissible for the opinion to be admitted. But if the facts or data would otherwise be
inadmissible, the proponent of the opinion may disclose them to the jury only if their
probative value in helping the jury evaluate the opinion substantially outweighs their
prejudicial effect;
(3) (a) An opinion is not objectionable just because it embraces an ultimate issue.
(b) In a criminal case, an expert witness shall not state an opinion about whether the
defendant did or did not have a mental state or condition that constitutes an element of the
crime charged or of a defense. Those matters are for the trier of fact alone;
(4) Unless the court orders otherwise, an expert may state an opinion and give the
reasons for it without first testifying to the underlying facts or data. But the expert may be
required to disclose those facts or data on cross-examination.
3. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a person, partnership, association,
or corporation, as owner, from testifying as to the reasonable market value of the owner's
land.
✔